Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.040

License renewal.

Every license issued under this chapter must be renewed biennially. Each licensee is responsible for timely renewal of the licensee's license. To renew a license, a licensee must follow the rules adopted under RCW 43.70.280.

[ 2023 c 175 s 5.]